Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5502
Policy.

It is the policy of this state to enact appropriate legislation to encourage new businesses to relocate to and existing businesses to expand in Nebraska and to provide appropriate inducements to encourage new and existing businesses to do so. The goals of the policy, to be achieved in a manner that is both fiscally sound and effective, are (1) to aid in the economic and population growth of the state and (2) to assist in the creation of better jobs for the residents of the state.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 2.